public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX c èser seròmi/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seralo/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seraƚo/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serami/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seratu/O [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serave/RS [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seremo/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seren/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sereni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serense [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seresi/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seresiu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serié/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seriéu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serimo/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serion/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serioni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serionse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serisen/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seriseni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serisense [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serisié/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serisiéu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serision/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serisioni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serisionse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serison/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serisoni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serisonse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seron/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seroni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seronse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser siàndome/G èser
SFX c èser si/N [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sime/H [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser simo/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sion/JL [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sioni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sionmi/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipí [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipié [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipi [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipia [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipie [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipiede [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipiege [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipiemo [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipien [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipiene [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipimo [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipion [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sipione [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser situ/O [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser son/JL [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser soni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sonmi/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser stà [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser stào/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser stado/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser stasto/BI [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser stesto/BI [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser xèra/JLPR èser
SFX c èser xèrami/K èser
SFX c èser xèrau/Q èser
SFX c èser xère/JL èser
SFX c èser xèrelo/B èser
SFX c èser xèreƚo/B èser
SFX c èser xèremi/K èser
SFX c èser xèri/NP èser
SFX c èser xèrimo/L èser
SFX c èser xèrimoi/M èser
SFX c èser xèritu/O èser
SFX c èser xèro/JL èser
SFX c èser xèromi/K èser
SFX c èser xelo/B èser
SFX c èser xeƚo/B èser
SFX c èser xe/R èser
SFX c er ar [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c er are èser
SFX c er arge [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser ra/JLPR [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser rami/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser rau/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser re/JL [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser relo/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser reƚo/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser remi/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser ri/NP [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser rimo/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser rimoi/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser ritu/O [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser ro/JL [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c ser romi/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
