public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.dic
èrđer/cE
èrxer/cE
ónđer/cE
đèmer/cE
đemerò/cJL
ŧéder/cE
ŧénxer/cE
ŧenđerò/cJL
ŧernerò/cJL
ƚexerò/cJL
ɉòler/cE
ađonxerò/cJL
acèñer/cE
aceñerò/cJL
aflíxer/cE
akòɉer/cE
akòrđer/cE
akaderò/cJL
akorđerò/cJL
akorxerò/cJL
antefàŧer/cE
antefaserò/cJL
anteponerò/cJL
aparcéñer/cE
apartéñer/cE
aplàuder/cE
arénder/cE
arkòɉer/cE
arkoɉerò/cJL
arveñerò/cJL
asíster/cE
asòrber/cE
ascéñer/cE
asenterò/cJL
asolverò/cJL
astéñer/cE
astrénđer/cE
astrénxer/cE
astrenderò/cJL
atèñer/cE
aténder/cE
atràer/cE
aveñerò/cJL
axonxerò/cJL
bóɉer/cE
barluxerò/cJL
benedíxer/cE
boɉerò/cJL
céñer/cE
déver/cE
daríder/cE
deđonxerò/cJL
deŧiderò/cJL
decèñer/cE
dedónxer/cE
dedonxerò/cJL
defenderò/cJL
dekréser/cE
deméter/cE
demorderò/cJL
depénxer/cE
depenđerò/cJL
deponerò/cJL
desíder/cE
desfríder/cE
desfriderò/cJL
deskàđer/cE
deskàxer/cE
deskađerò/cJL
deskonpóner/cE
deskonvèñer/cE
deskonvolxerò/cJL
deskovèrder/cE
deskoverđerò/cJL
deskríver/cE
deskuèrder/cE
deskuerđerò/cJL
deskuxerò/cJL
desperderò/cJL
despiaxerò/cJL
desprometerò/cJL
destèser/cE
destínguer/cE
destòrxer/cE
destinguerò/cJL
destorderò/cJL
destrúxer/cE
detèñer/cE
deteñerò/cJL
devèñer/cE
deverò/cJL
dexónxer/cE
dexdíxer/cE
dexinprimerò/cJL
dexmeterò/cJL
dexvòlxer/cE
dexxónxer/cE
dispénder/cE
disponerò/cJL
dixdíxer/cE
dixerò/cJL
eƚíder/cE
elèđer/cE
elèxer/cE
elederò/cJL
eméter/cE
enténder/cE
erderò/cJL
esklúder/cE
espèler/cE
esplòder/cE
esténder/cE
estenderò/cJL
estràxer/cE
evàder/cE
evínser/cE
evinserò/cJL
exímer/cE
exiɉerò/cJL
existerò/cJL
fàxer/cE
fénxer/cE
fúxer/cE
faxerò/cJL
fenxerò/cJL
fleterò/cJL
frànder/cE
frèmer/cE
fríxer/cE
franxerò/cJL
fraponerò/cJL
friderò/cJL
gòder/cE
inđónxer/cE
inŧénder/cE
inŧernerò/cJL
inɉòter/cE
inakòrder/cE
inakorderò/cJL
inbàter/cE
inbeverò/cJL
indíxer/cE
indúxer/cE
induxerò/cJL
infrànđer/cE
infrànxer/cE
infranxerò/cJL
inkòrđer/cE
inkòrxer/cE
inklúder/cE
inkoncèñer/cE
inkonceñerò/cJL
inkonteñerò/cJL
inkorerò/cJL
inpóner/cE
inprométer/cE
inprometerò/cJL
insénder/cE
insíder/cE
insíster/cE
insernerò/cJL
insiderò/cJL
inskríver/cE
inténđer/cE
inténxer/cE
intòrđer/cE
intarónper/cE
intarŧéder/cE
intarŧederò/cJL
intaronperò/cJL
intarséder/cE
intarvèñer/cE
intenđerò/cJL
intenxerò/cJL
interónper/cE
interdíxer/cE
interdixerò/cJL
interonperò/cJL
intervèñer/cE
interveñerò/cJL
intorderò/cJL
intracèñer/cE
intraceñerò/cJL
intraprénder/cE
intratéñer/cE
intrateñerò/cJL
intravèñer/cE
intravederò/cJL
introdúxer/cE
introméter/cE
invàder/cE
invaderò/cJL
involxerò/cJL
iskríver/cE
iskriverò/cJL
jòler/cE
kànder/cE
kànxer/cE
kòxer/cE
kúxer/cE
kanderò/cJL
kanxerò/cJL
koñoserò/cJL
koinvòlxer/cE
koinvolxerò/cJL
kometerò/cJL
komoverò/cJL
konóser/cE
konđonxerò/cJL
konŧederò/cJL
konbàter/cE
koncéñer/cE
konceñerò/cJL
kondónxer/cE
konduxerò/cJL
koneterò/cJL
konfonderò/cJL
konklúder/cE
konkorerò/cJL
konoserò/cJL
konpóner/cE
konpeterò/cJL
konpiàxer/cE
konponerò/cJL
konprénder/cE
konprométer/cE
konsèguer/cE
konsederò/cJL
konseguerò/cJL
konstrénxer/cE
konstrenđerò/cJL
konstrenderò/cJL
kontéñer/cE
kontòrđer/cE
kontòrxer/cE
kontorđerò/cJL
kontorxerò/cJL
kontràer/cE
kontraerò/cJL
kontrapóner/cE
kontraponerò/cJL
kontrobàter/cE
kontrobaterò/cJL
konvèrter/cE
konvínser/cE
konveñerò/cJL
konverterò/cJL
konviverò/cJL
konxónxer/cE
konxonxerò/cJL
korónper/cE
korerò/cJL
koroderò/cJL
kostrénđer/cE
kostrénxer/cE
kostrenđerò/cJL
kovèrđer/cE
kovèrder/cE
kovèrxer/cE
koverxerò/cJL
koxerò/cJL
kréser/cE
kreserò/cJL
kuèrder/cE
kuèrxer/cE
kuerxerò/cJL
kuxerò/cJL
lèđer/cE
lúxer/cE
leđerò/cJL
lexerò/cJL
méter/cE
mòjer/cE
mòlđer/cE
mòrder/cE
mòver/cE
mónđer/cE
maƚedíxer/cE
maƚedixerò/cJL
maledixerò/cJL
malmeterò/cJL
malnaserò/cJL
mancèñer/cE
manceñerò/cJL
mancenerò/cJL
manométer/cE
mantéñer/cE
manteñerò/cJL
mièder/cE
moɉerò/cJL
molđerò/cJL
molderò/cJL
monderò/cJL
monxerò/cJL
morderò/cJL
nòxer/cE
naserò/cJL
ocèñer/cE
oceñerò/cJL
ofenderò/cJL
okórer/cE
ométer/cE
ometerò/cJL
onđerò/cJL
opóner/cE
oponerò/cJL
otéñer/cE
pànder/cE
pénđer/cE
pénder/cE
póner/cE
pónxer/cE
panderò/cJL
parkórer/cE
parkorerò/cJL
parmeterò/cJL
parseguerò/cJL
parsuaderò/cJL
parvèñer/cE
parverterò/cJL
penđerò/cJL
penderò/cJL
perinténder/cE
perintenderò/cJL
perkorerò/cJL
permeterò/cJL
perseguerò/cJL
persuàder/cE
pervèrter/cE
perveñerò/cJL
perverterò/cJL
piànxer/cE
piàxer/cE
pianđerò/cJL
pianxerò/cJL
pioverò/cJL
ponerò/cJL
pospóner/cE
posponerò/cJL
prèmer/cE
preƚuderò/cJL
predíxer/cE
prededuxerò/cJL
preinténder/cE
prelúder/cE
preluderò/cJL
premeterò/cJL
prenderò/cJL
preténder/cE
prevénder/cE
prevederò/cJL
prexúmer/cE
proŧéder/cE
prodúxer/cE
produxerò/cJL
prometerò/cJL
promoverò/cJL
propénder/cE
proponerò/cJL
prosèguer/cE
prosederò/cJL
protèxer/cE
protenderò/cJL
protexerò/cJL
provéder/cE
provederò/cJL
ràder/cE
ríder/cE
ròder/cE
rađónxer/cE
radónxer/cE
radonxerò/cJL
ravéder/cE
ravolxerò/cJL
raxónxer/cE
raxonxerò/cJL
reŧíder/cE
reŧeverò/cJL
reƚèxer/cE
reƚexerò/cJL
rebàter/cE
rebóɉer/cE
reboɉerò/cJL
rebojerò/cJL
recèñer/cE
redíxer/cE
redúxer/cE
reduxerò/cJL
reeƚexerò/cJL
reelèder/cE
reelèxer/cE
reelexerò/cJL
reeserò/cJL
refónder/cE
refleterò/cJL
refonderò/cJL
rekòxer/cE
rekúxer/cE
rekonoserò/cJL
rekonpóner/cE
rekonvínser/cE
rekonvinŧerò/cJL
rekonvinserò/cJL
rekovèrder/cE
rekovèrxer/cE
rekoverderò/cJL
rekoxerò/cJL
rekréser/cE
rekrederò/cJL
relèđer/cE
relèder/cE
relèxer/cE
relederò/cJL
relexerò/cJL
reméter/cE
remeterò/cJL
renàser/cE
renaserò/cJL
renpiànder/cE
renpiànxer/cE
renpianđerò/cJL
repèter/cE
repóner/cE
reponerò/cJL
reprímer/cE
reprimerò/cJL
reprodúxer/cE
resíder/cE
resòlver/cE
resòrxer/cE
reskríver/cE
reskriverò/cJL
resorxerò/cJL
resoveñerò/cJL
respénder/cE
respénxer/cE
respenderò/cJL
respenxerò/cJL
resplénder/cE
restrénđer/cE
restrénder/cE
restrenđerò/cJL
restrenxerò/cJL
retéñer/cE
reténxer/cE
retòrxer/cE
reteñerò/cJL
retenxerò/cJL
retorxerò/cJL
retràer/cE
retraerò/cJL
retroŧéder/cE
retroséder/cE
retrosederò/cJL
revénder/cE
revíver/cE
revòlxer/cE
revenderò/cJL
reviverò/cJL
rexíster/cE
rexerò/cJL
rexolverò/cJL
rièser/cE
rieserò/cJL
rinkréser/cE
rinkreserò/cJL
roderò/cJL
romàñer/cE
ronperò/cJL
sèrner/cE
sénđer/cE
sòrxer/cE
sederò/cJL
senđerò/cJL
serverò/cJL
sfrànder/cE
sfríđer/cE
sfranderò/cJL
sfrixerò/cJL
skòrđer/cE
skónder/cE
skométer/cE
skonbàter/cE
skonpóner/cE
skonveñerò/cJL
skorđerò/cJL
skoterò/cJL
skoverđerò/cJL
skríver/cE
skuèrxer/cE
sođónxer/cE
sobójer/cE
sodonxerò/cJL
sokorerò/cJL
sorađónxer/cE
soraespóner/cE
soraskríver/cE
soravíver/cE
soraxonxerò/cJL
sorintenderò/cJL
soscéñer/cE
sostèñer/cE
sotintenderò/cJL
sotometerò/cJL
sotoxaserò/cJL
sovèrter/cE
soxàŧer/cE
soxaserò/cJL
spénđer/cE
spòrxer/cE
spenđerò/cJL
splenderò/cJL
sporxerò/cJL
storđerò/cJL
strénder/cE
straƚúxer/cE
strabójer/cE
strainténder/cE
strakórer/cE
strakrederò/cJL
straponxerò/cJL
stravòlxer/cE
strenderò/cJL
suaderò/cJL
supóner/cE
tàxer/cE
téñer/cE
tòrđer/cE
taxerò/cJL
tenxerò/cJL
torđerò/cJL
tràder/cE
traƚuxerò/cJL
traceñerò/cJL
traerò/cJL
trameterò/cJL
tranxiɉerò/cJL
traskórer/cE
trateñerò/cJL
travederò/cJL
vèñer/cE
vèrxer/cE
vénder/cE
víver/cE
venŧerò/cJL
verđerò/cJL
vinŧerò/cJL
xàŧer/cE
xèmer/cE
xɉanxerò/cJL
xbóɉer/cE
xbarlúxer/cE
xberlúxer/cE
xemerò/cJL
xgrénder/cE
xgrenderò/cJL
xjànxer/cE
xlénđer/cE
xlenđerò/cJL
xlièđer/cE
xlièxer/cE
xluxerò/cJL
xmonxerò/cJL
xvénder/cE
xvolxerò/cJL
